District of Columbia statutes.
1-206.01

Retention of constitutional authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Congress of the United States reserves the right, at any time, to exercise its constitutional authority as legislature for the District, by enacting legislation for the District on any subject, whether within or without the scope of legislative power granted to the Council by this chapter, including legislation to amend or repeal any law in force in the District prior to or after enactment of this chapter and any act passed by the Council.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 813, Pub. L. 93-198, title VI, § 601
1973 Ed., § 1-126.
1981 Ed., § 1-206.
This section is referenced in § 1-203.02, § 1-203.03, and § 1-204.04.
Budget and financial management, borrowing and spending limitations, see § 1-206.03.